Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7575.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-28-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-28 entitled "Parking
Facilities and Privileges" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-28-7. Motor vehicle plates for persons with disabilities — Entitlement —
Designated parking spaces — Violations.
(a) Persons, as defined in subsection (h) of this section, upon application and proof of
permanent or long-term disability to the division of motor vehicles, shall be issued one up to two
(2) motor vehicle disability parking privilege placard placards or in the case of a motorcycle, one
motor vehicle sticker, of blue which shall be imprinted with the white international symbol of
access, certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear the
expiration date upon its face. A placard or motorcycle sticker issued to a person whose disability is
temporary shall be substantially similar to that issued to a person with a permanent or long term
disability. The temporary placard, however, shall be a red placard with a white international symbol
of access, certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear
the expiration dates upon its face. A preliminary placard shall be similar to that issued to a person
with a permanent, long-term, or temporary disability. The preliminary placard shall be effective for
twenty-one (21) days, and may be issued by an applicant’s licensed physician, if in the medical
provider’s opinion the applicant’s medical condition merits the issuance of a preliminary placard
while the division considers the applicant’s qualifications for any type of disability parking permit.

The preliminary placard shall be an orange placard with a white international symbol of access,
certificate number, the words “Rhode Island Disability Parking Permit” and shall bear the
expiration date upon its face and shall be displayed on the dashboard of the vehicle in a manner
that it is clearly visible from the front. The division of motor vehicles shall promulgate rules
governing the issuance and use of preliminary placards. Applicants shall not be charged any fee
associated with the issuance of a preliminary placard. Physicians submitting false information to
the division of motor vehicles to obtain a preliminary placard on anyone’s behalf may be subject
to the penalties set forth in § 11-18-1.3. Persons issued a placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to
this section shall be entitled to the immunities of §§ 31-28-4 and 31-28-6. The placard shall conform
to the Uniform Parking System for Disabled Drivers standard issued by the United States
Department of Transportation. If an application for a placard or motorcycle sticker is denied, the
division of motor vehicles shall promptly notify the applicant in writing, stating the specific
reason(s) for the denial, and advising the applicant of the procedures for requesting a hearing to
appeal the denial. Prior to the appeal hearing, the applicant shall be provided with any and all
documents relied upon by the division in denying the application. If an application contains a
physician certification that the applicant is sufficiently disabled to require a placard or motorcycle
sticker, and the division has not provided specific reasons in its denial letter to the applicant, the
hearing officer shall summarily order that a placard or motorcycle sticker be provided to the
applicant. At all other hearings of application denials where a physician certification has been
provided, the division shall bear the burden of proof that the individual is not entitled to a placard
or motorcycle sticker pursuant to this chapter.
(b) A placard issued pursuant to this section shall be portable and used only when the
person is being transported. The placard is to be hung from the rear view mirror so as to be seen
through the front or rear windshield of the motor vehicle. A placard may be issued to a person with
a disability who does not own a motor vehicle, to be used only when he or she is being transported.
A motorcycle sticker issued pursuant to this section shall not be portable and shall be affixed to the
rear plate of the motorcycle.
(c)(1) The certificate of entitlement to the placard or motorcycle sticker shall be renewed
every six (6) years for individuals with a long-term disability, as defined in subsection (d) of this
section, and the renewal application shall require a physician’s certification that the condition has
not changed since the previous approval, and six (6) years for individuals with a permanent
disability as defined in subsection (h) of this section, in accordance with a schedule prepared by
the division of motor vehicles that uses the last name of an individual to determine the month of
renewal. If an application or subsequent renewal is accompanied by a physician’s certification that
LC005011 - Page 2 of 6

the applicant’s condition is a chronic, permanent impairment and that application is approved, then
any subsequent renewal shall be authorized upon receipt of a notarized affidavit from the applicant
or applicant’s, guardian or legal representative or a certificate from the applicant’s physician that
his or her condition has not changed since the previous approval.
(2) The certificate of entitlement to the placard or motorcycle sticker shall be covered with
plastic or similar material. The applicant shall, upon timely renewal, receive a sticker bearing the
expiration date of the certificate of entitlement to be affixed across the expiration date of the
disability parking privilege placard or in the case of a motorcycle the applicant shall receive a new
motorcycle sticker. The division of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations allowing
for the renewal of the certificates of entitlement by mail.
(3) Whenever the division of motor vehicles proposes to suspend, revoke or fail to renew
the certificate of entitlement for noncompliance with the requirements of this section or for
violation of subsection (h) of this section, the individual shall first be entitled to a hearing before
the division of motor vehicles to contest the proposed action. At the hearing, the division of motor
vehicles shall bear the burden of proof that the individual is not entitled to the placard or motorcycle
sticker pursuant to this chapter. There shall be no renewal fee charged for the placards or
motorcycle sticker. The division of motor vehicles shall be authorized to issue a temporary
disability parking privilege placard or motorcycle sticker immediately upon receipt of an
application for individuals with a temporary impairment, as defined in subsection (h) of this section.
A temporary placard or motorcycle sticker shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date of
issuance. Temporary placards or motorcycle stickers may be renewed for a period of one year or
less, as determined by the medical advisory board upon application if the disability persists. The
division of motor vehicles shall subsequently review the applications in accordance with the
procedures currently in effect as to applications from persons whose disability is long term. Any
issuance which, after subsequent review, shall be found to be inappropriate shall be revoked and
notice of the revocation shall be sent to the applicant.
(d) A person, other than a person with a disability, who for his or her own purposes uses
the parking privilege placard, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. A person
issued a special placard who uses the placard after expiration, or who shall allow unauthorized use
of the disability parking placard or sticker, may be subject to immediate revocation of the use of
the placard by the division of motor vehicles, and subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).
(e) Disability parking spaces shall be designated and identified by the posting of signs
above ground level incorporating the international symbol of access of white on blue, and the words
“Handicapped Parking,” “Disability Parking,” “Disabled Parking,” or “Reserved Parking” at each
LC005011 - Page 3 of 6

space, at both ends of a row or series of adjacent disability parking spaces, or at the entrance to a
parking lot restricted to only disability parking.
(f) A person, other than a person issued a special placard or motorcycle sticker pursuant to
this section, who parks a vehicle in a parking space designated for persons with disabilities, shall
be fined: (1) one hundred dollars ($100) for a first violation, (2) one hundred seventy-five dollars
($175) for a second violation, and (3) three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325) for a third or
subsequent violation. The vehicle may be subject to towing at the owner’s expense. Provided
further, that it shall not be unlawful for a person to park a vehicle in a space designated for person
with disabilities if that person is transporting a person who has been issued a special placard and is
properly displaying the placard on the vehicle.
(g) Enforcement of the parking provisions of this section shall be enforced by the local or
state authorities on public or private property when the location of the parking spaces is within the
purview of the State Building Code, chapter 27.3 of title 23.
(h) Definitions. For the purpose of this section:
(1) “Disabled” or “disability” means a permanent or long-term impairment which prevents
or impedes walking, which shall include but not be limited to: (i) an impairment which prevents
walking and requires use of a wheelchair; (ii) an impairment which involuntarily causes difficulty
or insecurity in walking or climbing stairs with or without the need to use braces, crutches, canes
or artificial support; (iii) an impairment caused by amputation, arthritis, blindness (including legally
blind), or orthopedic condition; (iv) an impairment in respiratory, circulatory, or neurological health
which limits the person’s walking capability; or (v) disabled veteran, pursuant to § 31-6-8 after
certification of eligibility from the Veterans’ Administration or other satisfactory documentation
of eligibility is presented. Persons with disabilities may be capable of working or may be presently
working.
(2) “Long-term disability” means an impairment which is potentially reversible or may
improve with appropriate medical treatment. At the time of application and or renewal, the
impairment should not be expected to improve prior to the expiration of the certification, to a point
where the individual does not meet the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) “Permanent disability” means an impairment which is non-reversible.
(4) “Temporary impairment” means an impairment which is expected to improve to a point
where the individual does not meet the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, within two
(2) years of the application.
(i) The department of revenue shall inform each licensed driver of the certificate procedures
and parking restrictions of this section and §§ 31-28-4 and 31-28-6, and a facsimile of the portable
LC005011 - Page 4 of 6

placards and motorcycle stickers issued under this section shall be sent to the enforcing authority
of each state, and each enforcing authority shall be informed of the parking restrictions of this
section and §§ 31-28-4 and 31-28-6. Recipients of disability parking privilege placards shall also
receive instructions on their use and the penalties for misuse, when the placard is initially issued.
(j) Any person who makes, manufactures, offers for sale or knowingly uses a counterfeit
parking privilege placard shall be fined up to five hundred dollars ($500) and/or forty (40) hours
of community restitution.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005011
========
LC005011 - Page 5 of 6